Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1754
Central credit union; board of directors; officers; supervisory committee.

At the first meeting of each fiscal year, the board of directors of a central credit union shall elect from its number a president, vice president, secretary, and treasurer. The offices of secretary and treasurer may be held by one person if the bylaws so provide. Officers shall hold office for one year or until their successors are chosen and duly qualified. At the first meeting of each fiscal year, the board of directors shall elect a supervisory committee of not less than five members, none of whom shall be a member of the board of directors or the credit committee.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 54.